Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8005
Business enterprise; use of certified industrial hygienist required; when.

A business enterprise shall not identify, represent, or advertise itself as a provider of industrial hygiene services provided by or under the direction and supervision of a certified industrial hygienist or a variation of such words unless the individuals directly employed by such enterprise to actually engage in any business practice which could be classified as industrial hygiene using the services of a certified industrial hygienist satisfy the requirements of the Certified Industrial Hygienist Title Protection Act. The action or intent of any business enterprise to provide for compensation the services of a certified industrial hygienist through subcontracting, subconsulting, or any means other than direct employment of a certified industrial hygienist shall be clearly conveyed in writing by the soliciting business enterprise to the prospective target audience of interest or buyer of such industrial hygiene services.

Laws 1997, LB 558, § 5.